Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2018.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 8, chapter 4, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 8-469.03, to read: START_STATUTE8-469.03. Abuse and neglect; reporting; financial incentives; definition A. The department may not enter into an agreement with any health care institution that would require or allow payment from the department to the health care institution or an employee or agent of the health care institution in exchange for reports to the department of child abuse or negligence. B. For the purposes of this section, "health care institution" has the same meaning prescribed in section 36-401.END_STATUTE